Maryland, session 2025, SB0172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–914.
(b) The Board of Trustees shall consist of the following [11] 12 members:
(1) the Secretary, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee, who shall serve as
the chair;
(2) the Secretary of Aging, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Labor, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Health, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Human Services, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES, EX OFFICIO, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(7) the Adjutant General of the Military Department, ex officio, or the
Adjutant General’s designee;
[(7)] (8) one representative of each of the following organizations,
appointed by the Governor:
– 1 –

Ch. 267 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) a veterans service organization;
(ii) a nonprofit organization that serves veterans; and
(iii) the business community;
[(8)] (9) a member of the House of Delegates appointed by the Speaker of
the House; and
[(9)] (10) a member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –